Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.new text end new text begin (a) Minnesota is known for its rich outdoor heritage and ethic. The state prides itself on its close connection to nature through outdoor recreation, appreciation, and conservation. The state is viewed nationally as a leader for its stewardship of and strong relationship fostered with its natural resources. Yet the state's children are losing their connection to the outdoors. Today, the state's children spend up to 44 hours per week in front of a screen and less than 10 minutes each day doing outdoor activities. The legislature finds that time outdoors helps children thrive physically, emotionally, and academically. Yet over the past few generations, childhood activities have largely moved indoors. In addition, access to the outdoors is too often determined by race, income, ability, and zip code. All children deserve equitable access to outdoor spaces where they can learn, play, and grow. But unfortunately today, access to outdoor opportunities is not equitable. new text end new text begin (b) Research shows participants in outdoor educational activities have higher graduation rates, improved school and peer relationships, higher academic achievement, enhanced critical thinking skills, more awareness of the relationship between science and nature, and improved leadership and collaboration skills. Outdoor educational programs also offer new opportunities for work-integrated learning in science, natural resources, education, land management, agriculture, outdoor recreation, and other employment sectors. Outdoor-based learning activities can also be a key element in the larger system of regular outdoor instructional time and outdoor experiences that includes STEM fields, after-school programs, summer camps, 4-H, scouting, and related programs that can spark a lifelong appreciation for the natural world. new text end new text begin (c) The legislature intends to establish a statewide Outdoor School for All grant program to address these needs and opportunities. The program will support immersive multiday and accredited overnight educational experiences for students in grades 4 to 8. The program will also ensure that all Minnesota students have a chance to benefit from outdoor education. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [84.9766] OUTDOOR SCHOOL FOR ALL; GRANT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of natural resources must establish and administer a program to provide grants to learning centers eligible under subdivision 2 for outdoor education programs serving students in grades 4 to 8. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may award grants under this section to accredited overnight outdoor school providers established under section 84.0875 and to other regional nonprofit learning centers offering similar programming. new text end new text begin (b) To be eligible for a grant under this section, the outdoor education program must: new text end new text begin (1) provide a multiday, residential educational experience that is comprised mainly of outdoor-based learning activities; new text end new text begin (2) provide students with opportunities to directly experience and understand nature and the natural world, including field study opportunities for student learning; new text end new text begin (3) use a research-based environmental, ecological, agricultural, or other natural-resource-based educational curriculum; new text end new text begin (4) be integrated with local school curricula to help students meet academic standards; new text end new text begin (5) provide students with opportunities to develop: new text end new text begin (i) leadership; new text end new text begin (ii) critical thinking; new text end new text begin (iii) self-sufficiency; new text end new text begin (iv) decision-making skills; and new text end new text begin (v) social and emotional skills; and new text end new text begin (6) address accessibility of outdoor educational opportunities for underserved students, including students with disabilities. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; OUTDOOR SCHOOL FOR ALL.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources for the Outdoor School for All program under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.9766. new text end